District of Columbia statutes.
47-885

Regulations.

The CFO may promulgate regulations to carry out the purpose of this subchapter.

History

Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-44, § 2, 48 DCR 7665

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of New York Avenue Metro Special Assessment Authorization Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-25, October 2, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9564).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of New York Avenue Metro Special Assessment Authorization Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-64, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5714).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of New York Avenue Metro Special Assessment Authorization Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-115, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7652).